New York, session 2025-2026, S10430.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, 2 Ronald Schultz, a tier V member of the New York state and local employ- 3 ees' retirement system employed by the Erie County Water Authority, who 4 was employed by the Erie County Sewer Authority from July 1, 2002 5 through November 9, 2002, and who, for reasons not ascribable to his own 6 negligence, failed to become a member of such retirement system during 7 such employment with the Erie County Sewer Authority in 2002, shall be 8 deemed to have joined the New York state and local employees' retirement 9 system on July 1, 2002 and shall be granted Tier IV status in such 10 retirement system, if, within one year of the effective date of this 11 act, he shall file a written request with the state comptroller. 12 § 2. No contributions made to the New York state and local employees' 13 retirement system by Ronald Schultz shall be returned or refunded to him 14 pursuant to this act. 15 § 3. All past service costs of implementing the provisions of this act 16 shall be borne by the county of Erie. 17 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15919-01-6